algorithms/armenian_mkrtchyan.sbl
/*
 * Armenian language stemmer
 *
 * Source obtained from https://snowballstem.org/algorithms/armenian/stemmer.html,
 * under the BSD public license, created by Astghik Mkrtchyan.
 */

stringescapes {}

stringdef a    '{U+0561}' // 531
stringdef b    '{U+0562}' // 532
stringdef g    '{U+0563}' // 533
stringdef d    '{U+0564}' // 534
stringdef ye   '{U+0565}' // 535
stringdef z    '{U+0566}' // 536
stringdef e    '{U+0567}' // 537
stringdef y    '{U+0568}' // 538
stringdef dt   '{U+0569}' // 539
stringdef zh   '{U+056A}' // 53A
stringdef i    '{U+056B}' // 53B
stringdef l    '{U+056C}' // 53C
stringdef kh   '{U+056D}' // 53D
stringdef ts   '{U+056E}' // 53E
stringdef k    '{U+056F}' // 53F
stringdef h    '{U+0570}' // 540
stringdef dz   '{U+0571}' // 541
stringdef gh   '{U+0572}' // 542
stringdef djch '{U+0573}' // 543
stringdef m    '{U+0574}' // 544
stringdef j    '{U+0575}' // 545
stringdef n    '{U+0576}' // 546
stringdef sh   '{U+0577}' // 547
stringdef vo   '{U+0578}' // 548
stringdef ch   '{U+0579}' // 549
stringdef p    '{U+057A}' // 54A
stringdef dj   '{U+057B}' // 54B
stringdef r    '{U+057C}' // 54C
stringdef s    '{U+057D}' // 54D
stringdef v    '{U+057E}' // 54E
stringdef t    '{U+057F}' // 54F
stringdef r'   '{U+0580}' // 550
stringdef c    '{U+0581}' // 551
stringdef u    '{U+0582}' // 552                  //vjun
stringdef bp   '{U+0583}' // 553
stringdef q    '{U+0584}' // 554
stringdef ev   '{U+0587}'
stringdef o    '{U+0585}' // 555
stringdef f    '{U+0586}' // 556

routines ( mark_regions R2
           adjective
           verb
           noun
           ending
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( pV p2 )

groupings ( v )

define v '{a}{e}{i}{o}{u}{ye}{vo}{y}'

define mark_regions as (

    $pV = limit
    $p2 = limit
    do (
        gopast v  setmark pV  gopast non-v
        gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p2
       )
)

backwardmode (

    define R2 as $p2 <= cursor

    define adjective as (
        [substring] among (
            '{b}{a}{r'}'
            '{p}{ye}{s}'
            '{vo}{r'}{e}{n}'
            '{vo}{v}{i}{n}'
            '{a}{k}{i}'
            '{l}{a}{j}{n}'
            '{r'}{vo}{r'}{d}'
            '{ye}{r'}{vo}{r'}{d}'
            '{a}{k}{a}{n}'
            '{a}{l}{i}'
            '{k}{vo}{t}'
            '{ye}{k}{ye}{n}'
            '{vo}{r'}{a}{k}'
            '{ye}{gh}'
            '{v}{vo}{u}{n}'
            '{ye}{r'}{ye}{n}'
            '{a}{r'}{a}{n}'
            '{ye}{n}'
            '{a}{v}{ye}{t}'
            '{g}{i}{n}'
            '{i}{v}'
            '{a}{t}'
            '{i}{n}'

              (delete)
        )
    )

    define verb as (
        [substring] among (
            '{vo}{u}{m}'
            '{v}{vo}{u}{m}'
            '{a}{l}{vo}{u}'
            '{ye}{l}{vo}{u}'
            '{v}{ye}{l}'
            '{a}{n}{a}{l}'
            '{ye}{l}{vo}{u}{c}'
            '{a}{l}{vo}{u}{c}'
            '{y}{a}{l}'
            '{y}{ye}{l}'
            '{a}{l}{vo}{v}'
            '{ye}{l}{vo}{v}'
            '{a}{l}{i}{s}'
            '{ye}{l}{i}{s}'
            '{ye}{n}{a}{l}'
            '{a}{c}{n}{a}{l}'
            '{ye}{c}{n}{ye}{l}'
            '{c}{n}{ye}{l}'
            '{n}{ye}{l}'
            '{a}{t}{ye}{l}'
            '{vo}{t}{ye}{l}'
            '{k}{vo}{t}{ye}{l}'
            '{t}{ye}{l}'
            '{v}{a}{ts}'
            '{ye}{c}{v}{ye}{l}'
            '{a}{c}{v}{ye}{l}'
            '{ye}{c}{i}{r'}'
            '{a}{c}{i}{r'}'
            '{ye}{c}{i}{n}{q}'
            '{a}{c}{i}{n}{q}'
            '{v}{ye}{c}{i}{r'}'
            '{v}{ye}{c}{i}{n}{q}'
            '{v}{ye}{c}{i}{q}'
            '{v}{ye}{c}{i}{n}'
            '{a}{c}{r'}{i}{r'}'
            '{a}{c}{r'}{ye}{c}'
            '{a}{c}{r'}{i}{n}{q}'
            '{a}{c}{r'}{i}{q}'
            '{a}{c}{r'}{i}{n}'
            '{ye}{c}{i}{q}'
            '{a}{c}{i}{q}'
            '{ye}{c}{i}{n}'
            '{a}{c}{i}{n}'
            '{a}{c}{a}{r'}'
            '{a}{c}{a}{v}'
            '{a}{c}{a}{n}{q}'
            '{a}{c}{a}{q}'
            '{a}{c}{a}{n}'
            '{v}{ye}{c}{i}'
            '{a}{c}{r'}{i}'
            '{ye}{c}{a}{r'}'
            '{ye}{c}{a}{v}'
            '{c}{a}{n}{q}'
            '{c}{a}{q}'
            '{c}{a}{n}'
            '{a}{c}{a}'
            '{a}{c}{i}'
            '{ye}{c}{a}'
            '{ch}{ye}{l}'
            '{ye}{c}{i}'
            '{a}{r'}'
            '{a}{v}'
            '{a}{n}{q}'
            '{a}{q}'
            '{a}{n}'
            '{a}{l}'
            '{ye}{l}'
            '{ye}{c}'
            '{a}{c}'
            '{v}{ye}'
            '{a}'

                (delete)
        )
    )

    define noun as (
        [substring] among (
            '{a}{ts}{vo}'
            '{a}{n}{a}{k}'
            '{a}{n}{o}{c}'
            '{a}{r'}{a}{n}'
            '{a}{r'}{q}'
            '{p}{a}{n}'
            '{s}{t}{a}{n}'
            '{ye}{gh}{e}{n}'
            '{ye}{n}{q}'
            '{i}{k}'
            '{i}{ch}'
            '{i}{q}'
            '{m}{vo}{u}{n}{q}'
            '{j}{a}{k}'
            '{j}{vo}{u}{n}'
            '{vo}{n}{q}'
            '{vo}{r'}{d}'
            '{vo}{c}'
            '{ch}{ye}{q}'
            '{v}{a}{ts}{q}'
            '{v}{vo}{r'}'
            '{a}{v}{vo}{r'}'
            '{vo}{u}{dt}{j}{vo}{u}{n}'
            '{vo}{u}{k}'
            '{vo}{u}{h}{i}'
            '{vo}{u}{j}{dt}'
            '{vo}{u}{j}{q}'
            '{vo}{u}{s}{t}'
            '{vo}{u}{s}'
            '{c}{i}'
            '{a}{l}{i}{q}'
            '{a}{n}{i}{q}'
            '{i}{l}'
            '{i}{ch}{q}'
            '{vo}{u}{n}{q}'
            '{g}{a}{r'}'
            '{vo}{u}'
            '{a}{k}'
            '{a}{n}'
            '{q}'

                (delete)
        )
    )

    define ending as (
        [substring] R2 among (
            '{n}{ye}{r'}{y}'
            '{n}{ye}{r'}{n}'
            '{n}{ye}{r'}{i}'
            '{n}{ye}{r'}{d}'
            '{ye}{r'}{i}{c}'
            '{n}{ye}{r'}{i}{c}'
            '{ye}{r'}{i}'
            '{ye}{r'}{d}'
            '{ye}{r'}{n}'
            '{ye}{r'}{y}'
            '{n}{ye}{r'}{i}{n}'
            '{vo}{u}{dt}{j}{a}{n}{n}'
            '{vo}{u}{dt}{j}{a}{n}{y}'
            '{vo}{u}{dt}{j}{a}{n}{s}'
            '{vo}{u}{dt}{j}{a}{n}{d}'
            '{vo}{u}{dt}{j}{a}{n}'
            '{ye}{r'}{i}{n}'
            '{i}{n}'
            '{s}{a}'
            '{vo}{dj}'
            '{i}{c}'
            '{ye}{r'}{vo}{v}'
            '{n}{ye}{r'}{vo}{v}'
            '{ye}{r'}{vo}{u}{m}'
            '{n}{ye}{r'}{vo}{u}{m}'
            '{vo}{u}{n}'
            '{vo}{u}{d}'
            '{v}{a}{n}{s}'
            '{v}{a}{n}{y}'
            '{v}{a}{n}{d}'
            '{a}{n}{y}'
            '{a}{n}{d}'
            '{v}{a}{n}'
            '{vo}{dj}{y}'
            '{vo}{dj}{s}'
            '{vo}{dj}{d}'
            '{vo}{c}'
            '{vo}{u}{c}'
            '{vo}{dj}{i}{c}'
            '{c}{i}{c}'
            '{v}{i}{c}'
            '{v}{i}'
            '{v}{vo}{v}'
            '{vo}{v}'
            '{a}{n}{vo}{v}'
            '{a}{n}{vo}{u}{m}'
            '{v}{a}{n}{i}{c}'
            '{a}{m}{b}'
            '{a}{n}'
            '{n}{ye}{r'}'
            '{ye}{r'}'
            '{v}{a}'
            '{y}'
            '{n}'
            '{d}'
            '{c}'
            '{i}'

                (delete)
        )
    )
)

define stem as (

    do mark_regions
    backwards setlimit tomark pV for (
        do ending
        do verb
        do adjective
        do noun
    )
)
